dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
    <pardef n="mekani/kus__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>ci</l><r>kus<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cina</l><r>kus<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kusen</l><r>kus<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kus</l><r>kus<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="medi/kus__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>ci</l><r>kus<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cina</l><r>kus<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kus</l><r>kus<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kusen</l><r>kus<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kus</l><r>kus<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cell/o__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>on</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>or</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>orna</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="mekanikus"><i>mekani</i><par n="mekani/kus__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="livmedikus"><i>livmedi</i><par n="medi/kus__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="cembalo"><i>cembal</i><par n="cell/o__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="medikus"><i>medi</i><par n="medi/kus__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="cello"><i>cell</i><par n="cell/o__n_ut"/></e>
